hr-HR: Značajke integracije audio/video sustava u motornom vozilu: Android Auto (žičano); Android Auto (bežično); Apple CarPlay (žičano); Apple CarPlay (bežično); Ulaz za stražnju kameru; Ugrađena navigacija; MirrorLink; Više ulaza za kamere; OBD2 integracija; Priprema za kontrole na upravljaču; Podrška za glasovnog asistenta; Ostalo
pt-PT: Recursos de integração de áudio e vídeo em veículos automóveis: Android Auto (com fios); Android Auto (sem fios); Apple CarPlay (com fios); Apple CarPlay (sem fios); Entrada para câmara traseira; Navegação integrada; MirrorLink; Várias entradas de câmara; Integração OBD2; Preparado para comandos no volante; Suporte de assistente de voz; Outro
hu: Gépjármű A/V-integrációs funkciók: Android Auto (vezetékes); Android Auto (vezeték nélküli); Apple CarPlay (vezetékes); Apple CarPlay (vezeték nélküli); Tolatókamera bemenet; Beépített navigáció; MirrorLink; Több kamera bemenet; OBD2 integráció; Kormányvezérlésre előkészítve; Hangalapú asszisztens támogatása; Egyéb
de: Funktionen zur Audio-/Video-Integration im Kraftfahrzeug: Android Auto (kabelgebunden); Android Auto (kabellos); Apple CarPlay (kabelgebunden); Apple CarPlay (kabellos); Rückfahrkamera-Eingang; Integrierte Navigation; MirrorLink; Mehrere Kameraeingänge; OBD2-Integration; Vorbereitet für Lenkradfernbedienung; Sprachassistent-Unterstützung; Sonstige
sv: A/V-integrationsfunktioner för motorfordon: Android Auto (trådbunden); Android Auto (trådlös); Apple CarPlay (trådbunden); Apple CarPlay (trådlös); Ingång för backkamera; Inbyggd navigering; MirrorLink; Flera kameraingångar; OBD2-integration; Förberedd för rattstyrning; Stöd för röstassistent; Andra
el: Χαρακτηριστικά ενσωμάτωσης οπτικοακουστικών συστημάτων για μηχανοκίνητα οχήματα: Android Auto (ενσύρματο); Android Auto (ασύρματο); Apple CarPlay (ενσύρματο); Apple CarPlay (ασύρματο); Είσοδος κάμερας οπισθοπορείας; Ενσωματωμένη πλοήγηση; MirrorLink; Πολλαπλές είσοδοι κάμερας; Ενσωμάτωση OBD2; Υποστήριξη χειριστηρίων τιμονιού; Υποστήριξη φωνητικού βοηθού; Άλλο
ja: 自動車用オーディオビジュアル統合機能: Android Auto (有線); Android Auto (ワイヤレス); Apple CarPlay (有線); Apple CarPlay (ワイヤレス); バックカメラ入力; 内蔵ナビゲーション; MirrorLink; 複数カメラ入力; OBD2連携; ステアリングリモコン対応; 音声アシスタント対応; その他
sl-SI: Lastnosti avdio-video (A/V) integracije motornega vozila: Android Auto (žično); Android Auto (brezžično); Apple CarPlay (žično); Apple CarPlay (brezžično); Vhod za kamero za vzvratno vožnjo; Vgrajena navigacija; MirrorLink; Več vhodov za kamero; Integracija z OBD2; Pripravljeno za obvolanske kontrole; Podpora za glasovnega pomočnika; Drugo
fr: Fonctions d’intégration audio/vidéo embarquées: Android Auto (filaire); Android Auto (sans fil); Apple CarPlay (filaire); Apple CarPlay (sans fil); Entrée de caméra de recul; Navigation intégrée; MirrorLink; Entrées de caméras multiples; Intégration OBD2; Prêt pour commande au volant; Prise en charge d’assistant vocal; Autre
nb: Funksjoner for integrering av A/V i motorkjøretøy: Android Auto (kablet); Android Auto (trådløs); Apple CarPlay (kablet); Apple CarPlay (trådløs); Inngang for ryggekamera; Innebygd navigasjon; MirrorLink; Flere kamerainnganger; OBD2-integrasjon; Klargjort for rattkontroll; Støtte for taleassistent; Annet
ko: 차량용 A/V 통합 기능: Android Auto(유선); Android Auto(무선); Apple CarPlay(유선); Apple CarPlay(무선); 후방 카메라 입력; 내장형 내비게이션; MirrorLink; 다중 카메라 입력; OBD2 연동; 스티어링 휠 제어 준비 완료; 음성 어시스턴트 지원; 기타
da: Funktioner til A/V-integration i motorkøretøjer: Android Auto (kabel); Android Auto (trådløs); Apple CarPlay (kabel); Apple CarPlay (trådløs); Indgang til bakkamera; Indbygget navigation; MirrorLink; Flere kameraindgange; OBD2-integration; Klar til betjening fra rattet; Understøttelse af stemmeassistent; Andet
vi: Tính năng tích hợp âm thanh/hình ảnh cho xe cơ giới: Android Auto (có dây); Android Auto (không dây); Apple CarPlay (có dây); Apple CarPlay (không dây); Đầu vào camera lùi; Điều hướng tích hợp sẵn; MirrorLink; Nhiều đầu vào camera; Tích hợp OBD2; Tương thích với bộ điều khiển trên vô lăng; Hỗ trợ trợ lý giọng nói; Khác
zh-TW: 汽車影音整合功能: Android Auto (有線); Android Auto (無線); Apple CarPlay (有線); Apple CarPlay (無線); 倒車顯影輸入; 內建導航; MirrorLink; 多鏡頭輸入; 整合 OBD2; 支援方向盤控制; 支援語音助理; 其他
nl: Motorvoertuig A/V-integratiekenmerken: Android Auto (bedraad); Android Auto (draadloos); Apple CarPlay (bedraad); Apple CarPlay (draadloos); Ingang voor achteruitrijcamera; Ingebouwde navigatie; MirrorLink; Meerdere camera-ingangen; OBD2-integratie; Geschikt voor stuurwielbediening; Ondersteuning voor spraakassistent; Overig
tr: Motorlu taşıt ses/görüntü entegrasyon özellikleri: Android Auto (kablolu); Android Auto (kablosuz); Apple CarPlay (kablolu); Apple CarPlay (kablosuz); Geri görüş kamerası girişi; Yerleşik navigasyon; MirrorLink; Çoklu kamera girişi; OBD2 entegrasyonu; Direksiyon kumandası uyumlu; Sesli asistan desteği; Diğer
sk-SK: Funkcie integrácie audiovizuálnych systémov do motorových vozidiel: Android Auto (káblové); Android Auto (bezdrôtové); Apple CarPlay (káblové); Apple CarPlay (bezdrôtové); Vstup pre cúvaciu kameru; Vstavaná navigácia; MirrorLink; Viacero kamerových vstupov; Integrácia OBD2; Príprava na ovládanie na volante; Podpora hlasového asistenta; Iné
es: Funciones de integración de A/V para vehículos: Android Auto (con cable); Android Auto (inalámbrico); Apple CarPlay (con cable); Apple CarPlay (inalámbrico); Entrada para cámara de marcha atrás; Navegación integrada; MirrorLink; Múltiples entradas para cámaras; Integración OBD2; Preparado para control en el volante; Compatibilidad con asistente de voz; Otro
ro-RO: Funcții de integrare A/V pentru vehicule cu motor: Android Auto (cu fir); Android Auto (wireless); Apple CarPlay (cu fir); Apple CarPlay (wireless); Intrare pentru cameră de marșarier; Navigație încorporată; MirrorLink; Mai multe intrări pentru camere; Integrare OBD2; Pregătit pentru control pe volan; Compatibilitate cu asistentul vocal; Altele
bg-BG: Функции за интеграция на аудио/видео оборудване в моторни превозни средства: Android Auto (с кабел); Android Auto (безжично); Apple CarPlay (с кабел); Apple CarPlay (безжично); Вход за камера за задно виждане; Вградена навигация; MirrorLink; Множество входове за камери; Интеграция с OBD2; Готовност за управление от волана; Поддръжка на гласов асистент; Друго
it: Funzionalità di integrazione audio/video per autoveicoli: Android Auto (cablato); Android Auto (wireless); Apple CarPlay (cablato); Apple CarPlay (wireless); Ingresso per telecamera di retromarcia; Navigazione integrata; MirrorLink; Ingressi per videocamere multiple; Integrazione OBD2; Predisposizione per controlli al volante; Supporto assistente vocale; Altro
cs: Integrace audiovizuálních prvků do motorových vozidel: Android Auto (kabelové); Android Auto (bezdrátové); Apple CarPlay (kabelové); Apple CarPlay (bezdrátové); Vstup pro couvací kameru; Vestavěná navigace; MirrorLink; Více vstupů pro kamery; Integrace OBD2; Připraveno pro ovládání na volantu; Podpora hlasového asistenta; Jiné
fi: Moottoriajoneuvojen A/V-integraatio-ominaisuudet: Android Auto (langallinen); Android Auto (langaton); Apple CarPlay (langallinen); Apple CarPlay (langaton); Peruutuskameran tulo; Sisäänrakennettu navigointi; MirrorLink; Useita kameraliitäntöjä; OBD2-integraatio; Valmius ohjauspyörän säätimille; Ääniavustajan tuki; Muu
ru: Функции A/V-интеграции транспортного средства: Android Auto (проводной); Android Auto (беспроводной); Apple CarPlay (проводной); Apple CarPlay (беспроводной); Вход для камеры заднего вида; Встроенная навигация; MirrorLink; Входы для нескольких камер; Интеграция с OBD2; Поддержка управления на руле; Поддержка голосового помощника; Другое
pt-BR: Veículo automotor recursos de integração A/V: Android Auto (com fio); Android Auto (sem fio); Apple CarPlay (com fio); Apple CarPlay (sem fio); Entrada para câmera de ré; Navegação integrada; MirrorLink; Múltiplas entradas para câmeras; Integração OBD2; Pronto para controle no volante; Suporte para assistente de voz; Outros
pl: Funkcje integracji systemów audiowizualnych w pojazdach silnikowych: Android Auto (przewodowo); Android Auto (bezprzewodowo); Apple CarPlay (przewodowo); Apple CarPlay (bezprzewodowo); Wejście kamery cofania; Wbudowana nawigacja; MirrorLink; Wiele wejść kamery; Integracja z OBD2; Obsługa sterowania z kierownicy; Obsługa asystenta głosowego; Inne
th: คุณสมบัติการบูรณาการระบบเสียงและวิดีโอในรถยนต์: Android Auto (แบบมีสาย); Android Auto (แบบไร้สาย); Apple CarPlay (แบบมีสาย); Apple CarPlay (แบบไร้สาย); อินพุตกล้องมองหลัง; ระบบนำทางในตัว; MirrorLink; อินพุตกล้องหลายตัว; การผสานการทำงานกับ OBD2; รองรับการควบคุมที่พวงมาลัย; รองรับระบบสั่งงานด้วยเสียง; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 机动车影音集成功能: Android Auto（有线）; Android Auto（无线）; Apple CarPlay（有线）; Apple CarPlay（无线）; 倒车摄像头输入; 内置导航; MirrorLink; 多摄像头输入; OBD2 集成; 预留方向盘控制; 支持语音助手; 其他
en: Motor vehicle A/V integration features: Android Auto (wired); Android Auto (wireless); Apple CarPlay (wired); Apple CarPlay (wireless); Backup camera input; Built-in navigation; MirrorLink; Multiple camera inputs; OBD2 integration; Steering wheel control ready; Voice assistant support; Other
lt-LT: Motorinės transporto priemonės A/V integracijos funkcijos: „Android Auto“ (laidinis); „Android Auto“ (belaidis); „Apple CarPlay“ (laidinis); „Apple CarPlay“ (belaidis); Atbulinės eigos kameros įvestis; Įmontuota navigacija; „MirrorLink“; Kelių kamerų įvestys; OBD2 integracija; Pritaikyta valdymui nuo vairo; Balso asistento palaikymas; Kita